Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1248
Operation of a vessel without required equipment; prohibited.

No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of a vessel which is not equipped as required by the State Boat Act.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 48;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 118.